Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.130

Sale of property.

If the referees report to the court that the property, of which partition shall have been decreed, or any separate portion thereof is so situated that a partition thereof cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners, and the court is satisfied that such report is correct, it may thereupon by an order direct the referees to sell the property or separate portion thereof.

[Code 1881 s 564; 1877 p 119 s 569; 1869 p 135 s 517; RRS s 850.]